Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.215.020

Allocations of state or federal funds—Rules.

Expenditures under federal funds and/or state appropriations made to carry out the purposes of RCW 28A.215.010 through 28A.215.050 shall be made by warrants issued by the state treasurer upon order of the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public instruction shall make necessary rules to carry out the purpose of RCW 28A.215.010. The superintendent shall consult with the department of children, youth, and families when establishing relevant rules.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 218; 2006 c 263 s 411; 1995 c 335 s 308; 1990 c 33 s 210; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.34.020. Prior: 1943 c 220 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5109-2. Formerly RCW 28A.34.020, 28.34.020, 28.34.030.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.